Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.041

Milk producer's license.

Every milk producer must obtain a milk producer's license to operate as a milk producer as defined in this chapter. A milk producer's license is not transferable with respect to persons or locations or both. The license, issued by the director upon approval of an application for the license and compliance with the provisions of this chapter, shall contain the license number, name, residence, and place of business, if any, of the licensee.

[ 1994 c 143 s 202.]